Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-419.01
Hospital pharmacy, defined.

Hospital pharmacy means each facility licensed as a hospital in which the compounding, preparation for administration, or dispensing of drugs or devices pursuant to a chart order occurs for patients within the confines of the hospital with oversight by a pharmacist in charge.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 70.